Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3102
Declaration of intent and purpose.

The intent and purpose of sections 44-3101 to 44-3112 is to establish procedures for organizing and regulating the operations of professional association mutual insurance companies within the State of Nebraska and thereby to promote the general welfare of the people of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 2.